Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB555.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "valuable thing" in section 1621(k) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 1621. Definitions.--As used in this article, the following words have the following meanings:* * *(k) The words "valuable thing" shall mean all securities, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 goods, facilities, equipment, supplies, personnel, advertising, services, membership lists commonly offered or used commercially or other in-kind contributions provided without compensation, or at compensation which is below the usual and normal compensation for the items. The dollar value of a contribution of a valuable thing is the difference between the usual and normal charge for goods or services at the time of the contribution and the amount charged the candidate or political committee.Any of the categories hereinafter excluded from the definition of "valuable thing" shall not be deemed a contribution or expenditure for purposes of reporting or record keeping. The words "valuable thing" shall not include such de minimus items as the following:(1) Voluntary personal services provided by individuals who volunteer a portion or all of their time on behalf of a candidate or political committee.(2) The operation of a motor vehicle owned or leased by a candidate or a member of his immediate family or for consumption of food or beverages by a candidate or his immediate family.(3) The use of real or personal property, including a community room or a church used on a regular basis by members of a community for noncommercial purposes, and the cost of invitations, food and beverages voluntarily provided by an individual to any candidate in rendering voluntary personal services on the individual's residential premises or in the church or community room for candidate related activities, to the extent that the cumulative value of such invitations, food and beverages provided by such individual on behalf of any single candidate does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), with respect to any single election.20250HB0555PN0556 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The sale of any food or beverage by a vendor other than a corporation or unincorporated association for use in any candidate's campaign at a charge less than the normal comparable charge, if such charge is at least equal to the cost of such food or beverage to the vendor to the extent that the cumulative value of such reduced charge by such vendor on behalf of any single candidate does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) with respect to any single election.(5) Any unreimbursed payment for travel expenses made by any individual on behalf of any candidate to the extent that the cumulative value of such travel activity by such individual on behalf of any single candidate does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) with respect to any single election.(6) The use of the personal residence or the business or office space of the candidate other than a corporation or unincorporated association and the use of personal property owned or leased by the candidate: Provided, however, That the cumulative value of the use of such personal property does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) with respect to any single election.(7) The use of the personal residence or the business or office space of any volunteer, other than a corporation or unincorporated association, and the use of personal property owned or leased by a volunteer: Provided, however, That the cumulative value of the use of such personal property does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) with respect to any single election. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any matter prohibited in sections 1633 and 1843.(8) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of a political committee of a political party, an authorized 20250HB0555PN0556 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committee of a candidate or another political committee, if the legal or accounting services are solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with this article.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1627.1. Limitations on Campaign Contributions.--Aggregate contribution limits for a candidate may not exceed the levels established under 52 U.S.C. § 30116 (relating to limitations on contributions and expenditures) and regulations promulgated by the Federal Election Commission in accordance with 11 CFR 110 (relating to contribution and expenditure limitations and prohibitions).Section 3. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall certify the calculation of the levels determined under section 1627.1 of the act and shall transmit notice of the levels, including any changes to the levels, to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0555PN0556 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920